New York, session 2025-2026, S3201.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 168-l of the correction law, as 2 added by chapter 192 of the laws of 1995 and subparagraph (i) of para- 3 graph (a) as amended by chapter 11 of the laws of 2002, is amended and a 4 new subdivision 5-a is added to read as follows: 5 5. The board shall develop guidelines and procedures which include the 6 use of validated risk assessment instruments to assess the risk of a 7 repeat offense by such sex offender and the threat posed to the public 8 safety. Such risk assessment instruments shall be periodically subjected 9 to empirical re-validation. Such guidelines shall [be based upon,] 10 incorporate factors found to be predictive of risk of re-offense, 11 including but not limited to, the following: 12 (a) criminal history factors indicative of high risk of repeat 13 offense, including: 14 (i) whether the sex offender has a mental abnormality or personality 15 disorder that makes [him or her] the sex offender likely to engage in 16 predatory sexually violent offenses; 17 (ii) whether the sex offender's conduct was found to be characterized 18 by repetitive and compulsive behavior, associated with drugs or alcohol; 19 (iii) whether the sex offender served the maximum term; 20 (iv) whether the sex offender committed the felony sex offense against 21 a child; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06430-03-6 S. 3201--A 2 1 (v) the age of the sex offender at the time of the commission of the 2 first sex offense; 3 (b) other criminal history factors to be considered in determining 4 risk, including: 5 (i) the relationship between such sex offender and the victim; 6 (ii) whether the offense involved the use of a weapon, violence or 7 infliction of serious bodily injury; 8 (iii) the number, date and nature of prior offenses; 9 (c) conditions of release that minimize risk [or] of re-offense, 10 including but not limited to whether the sex offender is under super- 11 vision; receiving counseling, therapy or treatment; or residing in a 12 home situation that provides guidance and supervision; 13 (d) physical conditions that minimize risk of re-offense, including 14 but not limited to advanced age or debilitating illness; 15 (e) whether psychological or psychiatric profiles indicate a risk of 16 recidivism; 17 (f) the sex offender's response to treatment; 18 (g) recent behavior, including behavior while confined; 19 (h) recent threats or gestures against persons or expressions of 20 intent to commit additional offenses; and 21 (i) review of any victim impact statement. 22 5-a. (a) The board in consultation with the department and the divi- 23 sion of criminal justice services shall maintain a statewide database of 24 sex offender recidivism statistics. 25 (b) The board in consultation with the department and the division of 26 criminal justice services shall conduct a periodic retroactive study at 27 least every five years to determine the predictive value of the risk 28 assessment instruments used to assign risk of repeat offense levels to 29 sex offenders pursuant to subdivision six of this section. After each 30 such study the board shall prepare a detailed report to the governor and 31 legislature determining the predictive value of the risk assessment 32 instruments and the predictive value of each factor considered in the 33 overall risk assessment when applied to the statewide database main- 34 tained pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision. The report shall 35 include recommended changes to the guidelines and risk assessment 36 instruments to enhance their predictive capabilities for the purpose of 37 periodic revalidation of such guidelines and risk assessment instruments 38 pursuant to subdivision five of this section. The first such study shall 39 be completed within two years of the effective date of this subdivision. 40 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 41 it shall have become a law.